pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Materiais de envio: Caixas de mudanças e envio; Materiais de embalamento; Fita de embalamento
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pripomočki za pripravo pošiljk: Selitvene in transportne škatle; Embalažni materiali; Embalažni lepilni trakovi
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 物品運送: 搬運/物流箱; 包裝用品; 封箱膠帶
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Προμήθειες αποστολής: Κουτιά μεταφοράς & αποστολής; Υλικά συσκευασίας; Ταινίες συσκευασίας
en: Office Supplies > Shipping Supplies: Moving & Shipping Boxes; Packing Materials; Packing Tape
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria do pakowania: Pudełka wysyłkowe; Materiały pakunkowe; Taśmy do pakowania
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Товары для упаковки грузов: Коробки для переезда и посылок; Прокладочные и набивочные материалы; Упаковочная лента
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Verzendbenodigdheden: Verzend- en verhuisdozen; Verpakkingsmaterialen; Verpakkingstape
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pribor za otpremanje: Kutije za selidbu i otpremu; Materijali za pakiranje; Traka za pakiranje
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 包装快递用品: 搬运箱; 包装材料; 包装带
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Консумативи за доставка: Кутии за преместване и доставка; Опаковъчни материали; Тиксо за опаковане
es: Material de oficina > Accesorios para envíos: Cajas de mudanza y envío; Materiales de embalaje; Cinta de embalaje
ko: 사무용품 > 배송 용품: 이사/배송 상자; 포장재; 포장 테이프
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Transportavimo reikmenys: Perkraustymo ir transportavimo dėžės; Pakavimo medžiagos; Pakavimo juosta
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Suprimentos para remessas: Caixas de remessa e para mudança; Material de embalagem; Fita de embalagem
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimitustarvikkeet: Muutto- ja lähetyslaatikot; Pakkausmateriaalit; Pakkausteippi
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Đồ dùng chuyển hàng: Hộp di dời và vận chuyển; Đồ dùng đóng gói; Băng dính gói hàng
it: Forniture per ufficio > Forniture per spedizioni: Scatole per spedizioni e traslochi; Materiali per imballaggi; Nastro per imballaggi
ja: オフィス用品 > 梱包用品: 梱包用段ボール箱; 梱包資材; 梱包テープ
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Nakliye Sarf Malzemeleri: Taşıma ve Nakliyat Kutuları; Ambalaj Malzemeleri; Koli Bantları
hu: Irodai kellékek > Szállítási kellékek: Költöztető- és szállítódobozok; Csomagolóanyagok; Csomagolószalag
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Leveransmaterial: Flyttlådor och fraktlådor; Förpackningsmaterial; Packtejp
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Materiale pentru transport: Cutii pentru mutare și transport; Materiale de ambalare; Bandă adezivă
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์สำหรับจัดส่งสินค้า: กล่องสำหรับย้ายและขนส่ง; วัสดุสำหรับการบรรจุหีบห่อ; เทปสำหรับการบรรจุหีบห่อ
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Balicí potřeby: Krabice na stěhování a zásilky; Obalové materiály; Balicí páska
nb: Kontormateriell > Fraktutstyr: Flytte- og fraktesker; Pakkemateriell; Pakketape
de: Bürobedarf > Versandbedarf: Umzugs- & Versandkartons; Verpackungsmaterialien; Packband
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Prepravný materiál: Sťahovacie a prepravné boxy; Baliace materiály; Baliaca páska
da: Kontorforsyning > Forsendelsesmaterialer: Forsendelseskasser og flyttekasser; Pakkemateriale; Pakketape
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Fournitures d'expédition: Emballages de déménagement et d'expédition; Matériaux d'emballage; Ruban d'emballage